District of Columbia statutes.
2-362.02

Transfers and continuation.

All rules, orders, obligations, determinations, grants, contracts, licenses, and agreements shall continue in effect according to their terms until lawfully amended, repealed, or modified.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1202, 58 DCR 1185